Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
CREDENTIALING AND ADMINISTRATION
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Behavioral health provider” includes:
(A) An individual who is licensed, certified or otherwise authorized to  provide behavioral
health care services in this state; and
(B) An organizational provider, as defined in ORS 430.637.
(b) “Coordinated care organization” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority shall:
(a) Adopt by rule a uniform process for credentialing behavioral health providers; and
(b) Select an existing electronic  credentialing system for use by behavioral health pro-
viders and coordinated care organizations in credentialing behavioral health providers.
(3) A coordinated care organization:
(a) Shall use the credentialing system selected by the  authority for credentialing behav-
ioral health providers; and
(b) May not require a behavioral health provider to comply with any  credentialing pro-
cedures other than the uniform process adopted by the authority under this section.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Oregon Health Authority shall  select an electronic credentialing
system and complete rulemaking required under section  1 of this 2026 Act no later than June
30, 2027.
(2) A coordinated care organization,  as defined in ORS 414.025, shall begin using the
electronic credentialing system selected under section  1 of this 2026 Act no later than July
1, 2027.
SECTION 3. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Behavioral health provider” includes:
(A) An individual who is licensed, certified or otherwise authorized to  provide behavioral
health care services in this state; and
(B) An organizational provider, as defined in ORS 430.637.
(b) “Medical assistance” has the meaning given that term in ORS 414.025.
Enrolled House Bill 4083 (HB 4083-A) Page 1
(2) The Oregon Health Authority shall minimize unnecessary administrative burden  for
behavioral health providers who serve medical assistance recipients.
(3) In carrying out this section, the authority shall:
(a) Solicit suggestions from behavioral health providers; and
(b) Seek any necessary approval from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.
(4) Each biennium, the  authority shall report to the Governor and the committees of the
Legislative Assembly related to  behavioral health in the manner provided in ORS 192.245. The
report shall identify:
(a) The efforts that the authority has made  to solicit suggestions from behavioral health
providers;
(b) Any suggestions from behavioral health providers that the authority has  imple-
mented; and
(c) The status of any request  for approval from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services.
SUPERVISION OF BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS
SECTION 4.
Section 5 of  this 2026 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 675.510 to
675.600.
SECTION 5. (1) The State  Board of Licensed Social Workers shall adopt rules to allow,
in addition to those individuals regulated by the board, at least  the following individuals to
provide the supervision required for the issuance of an  authorization to practice regulated
social work:
(a) A licensed psychologist, as defined in ORS 675.010;
(b) A licensed marriage and family therapist, as defined in ORS 675.705; and
(c) A licensed professional counselor, as defined in ORS 675.705.
(2) In adopting rules under this section,  the board may consult as necessary with the
Oregon Board of Psychology and the Oregon  Board of Licensed Professional Counselors and
Therapists. If the rules adopted under this  section allow for supervision by individuals reg-
ulated by another health professional regulatory board, the State  Board of Licensed Social
Workers may consult with other health professional regulatory boards as necessary.
SECTION 6.
Section 7 of  this 2026 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 675.715 to
675.835.
SECTION 7. (1) The Oregon Board of Licensed Professional Counselors  and Therapists
shall adopt rules to allow, in addition to those individuals  regulated by the board, at least the
following individuals to provide the supervision required for  the issuance of a license or
registration to practice marriage and family therapy or professional counseling:
(a) A licensed psychologist, as defined in ORS 675.010; and
(b) A clinical social worker licensed under ORS 675.530.
(2) In adopting rules under this section, the board  may consult as necessary with the
Oregon Board of Psychology and the State Board of Licensed  Social Workers. If the rules
adopted under this section allow for supervision by individuals regulated by another health
professional regulatory board, the Oregon Board of Licensed Professional Counselors  and
Therapists may consult with other health professional regulatory boards as necessary.
SECTION 8.
(1) Sections 5 and 7 of this 2026 Act become operative on January 1, 2027.
(2) The Oregon Board of Psychology, the  Oregon Board of Licensed Professional Coun-
selors and Therapists and the State Board of Licensed Social Workers may take  any action
before the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable
the boards to exercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection  (1) of this
section, all of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the boards by sections 5 and 7
of this 2026 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 4083 (HB 4083-A) Page 2
CAPTIONS
SECTION 9. The unit captions used in this 2026 Act are provided only for the convenience
of the  reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or express any leg-
islative intent in the enactment of this 2026 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 10. This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House February 11, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate February 25, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4083 (HB 4083-A) Page 3